Massachusetts, session 194th, H1816.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 70 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place
thereof the following sentence:- These records shall be kept by secure, electronic digital media or
converted to electronic digital media as originally created by such hospital or clinic, by the
photographic or microphotographic process, or any combination thereof.
SECTION 2. Section 5 of chapter 201D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out the fifth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following 3
paragraphs:-
of 2

An attending physician who is provided with a health care proxy shall arrange for the
proxy or a copy thereof to be inserted electronically, in the same manner as a do not resuscitate
order, in the principal's medical record.
A facility shall transport a principal’s health care proxy in the same manner used to
transport a do not resuscitate order. The facility shall notify the health care agent, using contact
information provided by the principal, by telephone and email that the health care agent’s
authority has begun.
An attending physician shall grant a request by a principal to involve the health care
agent in discussions of health care with the attending physician.
of 2